Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and  made a part of ORS chapter 468A.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Advanced methane detection technology”  means satellite monitoring, airflight mon-
itoring, drones or remote direct  monitoring technology that yields emission rates and the
location of a methane emissions point source, as further defined by the Environmental
Quality Commission by rule.
(b) “Municipal solid  waste landfill” means a municipal solid waste landfill unit, as defined
in 40 C.F.R. 257.2, as in effect on January 1, 2025, located in Benton County.
(2) The commission  shall establish by rule requirements for surface emissions monitoring
and mitigation of methane gas emissions from municipal  solid waste landfills. The owner or
operator of a municipal solid waste landfill required to conduct surface  emissions monitoring
must:
(a) Use advanced methane detection technology  that meets minimum standards estab-
lished by the commission, to conduct surface  emissions monitoring above all areas of the
surface of the landfill;
(b) Report all surface emissions monitoring results to the Department of Environmental
Quality as follows:
(A) Results must include a spatial  geographic information system map drawn to scale
that includes:
(i) The longitude and latitude coordinates  of each exceedance carried to the fifth decimal
place; and
(ii) The monitoring path taken along the surface of the landfill, where applicable.
(B) For monitoring conducted using a drone:
(i) The longitude and latitude coordinates, carried to the fifth  decimal place, of
anemometer readings taken at five-minute intervals;
(ii) Collected meteorological data;
(iii) Flight transects with  path-integrated or surface concentration results that identify
results by concentration range or locations where concentrations  constitute an exceedance;
and
(iv) Equipment calibration records;
(c) Maintain all surface emissions monitoring records for no less than five years; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 726 (SB 726-B) Page 1
(d)(A) Monitor  the site of any exceedance within 10 days of first detecting the
exceedance, after taking any corrective action required by the commission by rule.
(B) If the  owner or operator cannot take corrective action at the site of an exceedance
because the exceedance is located within the active or working face of  the landfill, the owner
or operator must submit a mitigation plan to the department for approval.
SECTION 3. (1) Section 2 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
(2) The Department of Environmental  Quality and the Environmental Quality Commis-
sion may take any action before the operative date specified in subsection (1)  of this section
that is necessary to enable the department or the commission to  exercise, on and after the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of  the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the department and the commission by section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate April 10, 2025
Repassed by Senate June 4, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 726 (SB 726-B) Page 2